Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-32 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry may


enter into any public or private partnerships to foster veterinary


medicine business development in rural communities and other areas


of the state with a shortage of local veterinary services.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-959 MR 1/16/2025 3:12:48 PM





Req. No. 959 Page 1